Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-217
Federal service; treatment of guard members.

Nothing in sections 55-201 to 55-219 shall be construed as authorizing such forces, or any part thereof, to be called, ordered or in any manner drafted as such, into the military service of the United States, but no person shall by reason of his enlistment or commission in any forces be exempted from military service under any law of the United States.

Laws 1941, c. 116, § 7, p. 449;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 55-407;

R.S.1943, § 55-217.